src/mhr-lex.txt
Multichar_Symbols

+N +A +V
+Prop +Adv +Po +Pron
+CC +CS +Interj

+Nom +Gen +Acc +Com +Ill +Ine +Lat +Dat +Cmp

+Ind +Imp +Des +Prs +1Prt +2Prt +Ger +Inf +Ptc
+Act +Pass +Ins +Neg +Necess +Fut +Neg +ConNeg

+Pos +Cmp +Sup +Clt

+Sg1 +Sg2 +Sg3 +Pl1 +Pl2 +Pl3

+Pl +Sg +Pl-SamYC +Pl-la +Pl-mYt
+PxSg1 +PxSg2 +PxSg3 +PxPl1 +PxPl2 +PxPl3

+Des +Fut  +Instr  +Nec  +Prt 

+Infь ! error for +Inf1 ??
 
е1 а1 и1 у1 ӱ1 

X1 X2 X3 X4 X5 X6 X7 X8 X9 Z1 Z2 %-


LEXICON Root

words ;
Pronoun ;
Postposition ;
Punctuation ;


! ############# !
! CONTINUATIONS !
! ############# !

LEXICON CC
+CC: # ;

LEXICON CS
+CS: # ;

LEXICON Adv
+Adv: K ;

LEXICON A
+A: K ; ! missing comparative
+А+Comp:рак # ;

LEXICON A/S-a/e ! XXX do not know
A ;

LEXICON Prop
+N+Prop: N-continuation ;

LEXICON Puh-a/e ! XXX do not know
N-a/e ;


LEXICON Puh ! XXX do not know
N ;

LEXICON N
+N: N-continuation ;

LEXICON N-continuation 
!Lex0 ; 
K ; C ; S1 ; S2 ; S5 ; S6 ; P2 ; P4 ; P5 ; L ;

LEXICON N-a/e
+N: N-a/e-continuation ;

LEXICON N-a/e-continuation
!Lex0 ; 
K ; C ; S1 ; S2 ; S4 ; S6 ; P1 ; P4 ; P5 ; L ;

LEXICON N-VS
+N: N-VS-continuation ;

LEXICON N-VS-continuation
!Lex0 ; 
K ; C ; S1 ; S2 ; S3 ; S5 ; S6 ; P2 ; P3 ; P4 ; P5 ; L ;

LEXICON S  
Lex0 ; K ; C ; P2 ; P4 ; P5 ;

LEXICON S-a  
Lex0 ; K ; C ; P1 ; P4 ; P5 ;

LEXICON S-VS
Lex0 ; K ; C ; P2 ; P3 ; P5 ;

LEXICON Lx  
Lex0 ; K ; C ; S1 ; S2 ; S5 ; S6 ; P2 ; P4 ; P5 ;

LEXICON L-a 
Lex0 ; K ; C ; S1 ; S2 ; S4 ; S6 ; P1 ; P4 ; P5 ;

LEXICON P 
Lex0 ; K ; C ; S1 ; S2 ; S5 ; S6 ; L ; W5 ;

LEXICON P-a
Lex0 ; K ; C ; S1 ; S2 ; S4 ; S6 ; L ; W5 ;

LEXICON P-Z
S6 ; W5 ;



! ========================== !
! Verbal continuation lexica !
! ========================== !

LEXICON Vem
еш+Inf: Vem-continuation ;

LEXICON Vam
аш+Inf: Vam-continuation ;

LEXICON Vam-n/l
аш+Inf: Vam-n/l-continuation ;

LEXICON Vam-to-1t
аш+Inf: Vam-to-1t-continuation ;

LEXICON Vam--1t ! originally Vam->1t, assuming "->" is "to", tt100526
аш+Inf: Vam-to-1t-continuation ;

LEXICON Vam-n/l-to-1t
аш+Inf: Vam-n/l-to-1t-continuation ;

LEXICON Vam-n/l--1t ! originally Vam-n/l->1t , assuming "->" is "to", tt100526
аш+Inf: Vam-n/l-to-1t-continuation ;


! Redirecting to verbal sublexica
! -------------------------------

LEXICON Vem-continuation
V0 ; V2 ; V6 ; V8 ; V10 ; V11 ; W1 ; W2 ; W3 ;

LEXICON Vam-continuation
V0 ; V1 ; V4 ; V5 ; V7 ; V10 ; V11 ; W1 ; W2 ; W4 ;

LEXICON Vam-n/l-continuation
V0 ; V1 ; V3 ; V4 ; V7 ; V10 ; V11 ; W1 ; W2 ; W4 ;

LEXICON Vam-to-1t-continuation
V0 ; V1 ; V4 ; V5 ; V7 ; V10 ; V11 ; W0 ; W1 ; W2 ; W4 ;

LEXICON Vam-n/l-to-1t-continuation
V0 ; V1 ; V3 ; V4 ; V7 ; V10 ; V11 ; W0 ; W1 ; W2 ; W4 ;

LEXICON Vv- 
V1 ; V5 ; V7 ; W1 ; W4 ;

LEXICON Vc-/# 
V0 ; V4 ; V10 ; V11 ; W0 ; W2 ;

LEXICON W
Lex0 ; K ; C ; P2 ; P4 ; P5 ; S1 ; S2 ; S5 ; S6 ;

LEXICON W-VS
Lex0 ; K ; C ; P2 ; P3 ; P4 ; P5 ; S1 ; S2 ; S5 ; S6 ;

LEXICON W-SY
P1 ; P5 ; W5 ;

LEXICON W-la
Lex0 ; K ; C ; P2 ; P4 ; P5 ;

LEXICON K0
Lex0 ; K ; C ;

LEXICON Lex0 
# ;



! ####### !
! AFFIXES !
! ####### !


! Nominal affixes
! ----------------

! Case

LEXICON S1
+Nom: KO ;
+Gen:X1X3н K0 "GEN" ;
+Acc:X1X3м K0 "AKK" ;
+Com:X3ге K0 "KOM" ;

LEXICON S2
+Ill:X1X3ш S-VS "ILL" ;
+Ill:X1X3шке1 S "ILL" ;
+Ine:X1X3ште1 S "IN" ;

LEXICON S3
+Ill:X3ке1 S "ILL" ;
+Ine:X3те1 S "IN" ;

LEXICON S4
+Lat:X3ш S-VS "LAT" ;

LEXICON S5
+Lat:X3еш S-VS "LAT" ;

LEXICON S6
+Dat:X3лан S "DAT" ;
+Cmp:X3ла S-a "KOMP" ;


! Number

LEXICON L
+Pl:X4-влак Lx "PL" ; ! earlier L
+Pl:X4-шамыш Lx "PL-SamYC" ; ! earlier L
+Pl:X4ла L-a "PL-la" ;
+Pl:X4мыт Lx "PL-mYt" ; ! earlier L


! Person

LEXICON P1
+PxSg1:X1X5м P "PX-SG-1" ;
+PxSg2:X1X5т P "PX-SG-2" ;

LEXICON P2
+PxSg1:X5ем P "PX-SG-1" ;
+PxSg2:X5ет P "PX-SG-2" ;

LEXICON P3
+PxSg3:X5Yже1 P "PX-SG-3" ;

LEXICON P4
+PxSg3:X5же1 P "PX-SG-3" ;

LEXICON P5
+PxSg3:X1X5ж P-Z "PX-SG-3" ;
+PxPl1:X5на P-a "PX-PL-1" ;
+PxPl2:X5да P-a "PX-PL-2" ;
+PxPl3:X1X5шт P "PX-PL-3" ;
+PxSg3:X5ждене K0 "PX-SG-3+dene" ;
+PxSg3:X5ждеке K0 "PX-SG-3+deke" ;
+PxSg3:X5ждеч K0 "PX-SG-3+deC" ;


! Verbal affixes
! ---------------

LEXICON z-C
zаш+Inf:з Vv- " " ;
Cаш+Inf:ч Vc-/# " " ;

LEXICON t-0
tаш+Inf:т Vv- " " ;
!Lex0 Vc-/# " " ;

LEXICON k-0
kаш+Inf:к Vv- "xxx" ;
!Lex0 Vc-/# "xxx" ;

LEXICON nC-C
nаш+Inf:нч Vv- " " ;
Cаш+Inf:ч Vc-/# " " ;


LEXICON V0
+Imp+Sg2:X2X1 K0 "IMP-SG-2" ;
+ConNeg:X2X1 K0 "KIELTOVART" ;

LEXICON V1
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:X2ам K0 "IND-PREES-SG-1" ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:X2ат K0 "IND-PREES-SG-2" ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:X2еш K0 "IND-PREES-SG-3" ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:X2ына K0 "IND-PREES-PL-1" ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:X2ыда K0 "IND-PREES-PL-2" ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:X2ыт K0 "IND-PREES-PL-3" ;

LEXICON V2
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:X2ем K0 "IND-PREES-SG-1" ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:X2ет K0 "IND-PREES-SG-2" ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:X2а  K0 "IND-PREES-SG-3" ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:X2ена K0 "IND-PREES-PL-1" ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:X2еда K0 "IND-PREES-PL-2" ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:X2ат  K0 "IND-PREES-PL-3" ;

LEXICON V3
ь V5 " " ;

LEXICON V4
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:X2на K0 "IND-1-PRET-PL-1" ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:X2да K0 "IND-1-PRET-PL-2" ;

LEXICON V5
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:X2ым K0 "IND-1-PRET-SG-1" ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:X2ыч K0 "IND-1-PRET-SG-2" ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:X2е1 K0 "IND-1-PRET-SG-3" ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:X2ыч K0 "IND-1-PRET-PL-3" ;

LEXICON V6
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:X2шым K0 "IND-1-PRET-SG-1" ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:X2шыч K0 "IND-1-PRET-SG-2" ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:X2ш K0 "IND-1-PRET-SG-3" ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:X2шна K0 "IND-1-PRET-PL-1" ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:X2шда K0 "IND-1-PRET-PL-2" ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:X2шт K0 "IND-1-PRET-PL-3" ;

LEXICON V7
X5Yn V8 "xxx" ;

LEXICON V8
X5en V9 "xxx" ;

LEXICON V9
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:X2ам K0 "IND-2-PRET-SG-1" ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:X2ат K0 "IND-2-PRET-SG-2" ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:X2X1 K0 "IND-2-PRET-SG-3" ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:X2на K0 "IND-2-PRET-PL-1" ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:X2да K0 "IND-2-PRET-PL-2" ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:X2ыт K0 "IND-2-PRET-PL-3" ;

LEXICON V10
+Imp+Sg3:X2же1 K0 "IMP-SG-3" ;
+Imp+Pl2:X2за K0 "IMP-PL-2" ;
+Imp+Pl3:X1X2шт K0 "IMP-PL-3" ;

LEXICON V11
+Des+Prs+Sg1:X2нем K0 "DES-PREES-SG-1" ;
+Des+Prs+Sg2:X2нет K0 "DES-PREES-SG-2" ;
+Des+Prs+Sg3:X2неже K0 "DES-PREES-SG-3" ;
+Des+Prs+Pl1:X2нена K0 "DES-PREES-PL-1" ;
+Des+Prs+Pl2:X2неда K0 "DES-PREES-PL-2" ;
+Des+Prs+Pl3:X2нешт K0 "DES-PREES-PL-3" ;

LEXICON W0
+Ger+Instr:X5X1 K0 "GER-INSTR-0" ;

LEXICON W1
+Inf:X7аш S "INF-PERUS" ;

LEXICON W2
+Inf+Nec:X2ман K0 "INF-NESESS" ;
+Ptc+Act:$ше1 W "PART-AKT" ;
+Ptc+Pas:$ме1 W "PART-PASS" ;
+Ptc+Fut:$шаш W "PART-FUT" ;
+Ptc+Neg:$дыме1 W "PART-NEG" ;
+Ger+Instr+Neg:X7де S-a "GER-INSTR-NEG" ;
+Ger:X7меке S-a "GER-AIKAIS" ;
+Ger:X7меш S "GER-MY=ъъH-mеш" ;
+Ger:X7мешке S-a "GER-MY=ъъH-mешke" ;
+Ger:X7шын S "GER-SAMANAIK-SYn" ;
+Ger:@шы W-la "GER-SAMANAIK-SYla" ;
+Ger:@мы W-la "GER-SAMANAIK-mYla" ;

LEXICON W3 
+Ger+Instr:X7ен S "GER-INSTR" ;

LEXICON W4 
+Ger+Instr:X7ын S "GER-INSTR" ;

LEXICON W5 
~ла K0 ;

LEXICON C 
+Cmp:&рак Lex0 "rak" ;

LEXICON K 
!Lex0 ; ! Assume что, ден, да, але, теве, ok.
&ак Lex0 "ak" ;
&ат Lex0 "at" ;
&-йа Lex0 "-ja" ;
&-йан Lex0 "-jan" ;
&-але Lex0 "-ale" ;
&-с Lex0 "-s" ;
&-ыс Lex0 "-Ys" ;

LEXICON KO
# ;


! First aid lexica, these are not defined.
! They are either typos or unfinished work.

LEXICON Vam-n/l1t
 # ;

LEXICON PronRes
+Pron: # ;

LEXICON N-A7e
 # ;

LEXICON PromInd
+Pron: # ;

LEXICON PronI
+Pron: # ;

LEXICON PronIR
+Pron+Interr: # ;

LEXICON PronInd
+Pron+Ind: # ;

LEXICON KvMurt
 # ;

LEXICON KvK
 # ;

LEXICON PronP
 # ;

LEXICON PronD
 # ;

LEXICON Vkielt
+V+Neg: # ;

LEXICON V
 # ;

LEXICON N-e/a
 # ;

LEXICON Pimp
 # ;

LEXICON I
 # ;

LEXICON Ruotsi
 # ;

LEXICON N-Vs
 # ;

LEXICON PronRef
 # ;

LEXICON a
 # ;

LEXICON KvKoll
 # ;

LEXICON KvInd
 # ;

LEXICON A-VS
 # ;

LEXICON KvO
 # ;

!LEXICON X
! # ;

LEXICON A-a/e
 # ;

LEXICON Pmuu
+Interj: # ; ! Several Pmuu do not belong here

LEXICON A/S
 # ;

LEXICON A/S-VS
 # ;

LEXICON Kv-a/e
 # ;

LEXICON Vem-jykte1
 # ;

LEXICON Pron
+Pron # ;

LEXICON Vem--Vam-n/l
 # ;

LEXICON Vam-1t
 # ;

LEXICON VKielt
+V+Neg: # ;

LEXICON Vem-Syle1
 # ;

LEXICON Saxmatistka1
 # ;

LEXICON ymbaCYn
 # ;

LEXICON ymbaC
 # ;

LEXICON utYktare1
 # ;

LEXICON tYgutlашte1
 # ;

LEXICON tYgudешte1
 # ;

LEXICON X
 # ;

LEXICON S-a/e
 # ;
